Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1709
Indicted convicts; custody.

Whenever any convict in a Department of Correctional Services adult correctional facility is indicted for any offense committed while confined therein, such convict shall remain in the custody of the warden of the facility subject to the order of the district court of the county where the facility in which such convict is confined is situated.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 434, p. 820;

R.S.1913, § 9078;

C.S.1922, § 10102;

C.S.1929, § 29-1709;

R.S.1943, § 29-1709;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 8.